Wisconsin, session 2025, AB491.
do enact as follows:AB491,11Section 1. 48.672 of the statutes is created to read:AB491,2,8248.672 Video surveillance and recording. (1) Group homes, shelter care 3facilities, and child welfare agencies that operate a residential care center for 4children and youth may use video surveillance and recordings in common areas, 5entrances, and exits without the consent of the child being surveilled or recorded. 6The group home, shelter care facility, or child welfare agency shall inform the child 7and the child's parent, guardian, legal custodian, or Indian custodian about the 8video surveillance and recording.AB491,2,129(2) All child welfare agencies that operate a residential care center for 10children and youth, all group homes, and all shelter care facilities shall adopt a 11policy for monitoring safety in those facilities, which may include the use of video 12surveillance and recording in common areas, entrances, and exits.AB491,2,1513(3) Video surveillance and recording authorized under subs. (1) and (2) may 14not be used as a substitute for one-on-one monitoring of a child who is at high risk 15for self-harm.AB491,3,61(4) Video recording data under this section is confidential and not open to 2public inspection, except that the exceptions to the confidentiality of records that 3apply to agencies under s. 48.78 (2) apply to residential care centers for children 4and youth, group homes, and shelter care facilities with respect to video recording 5data under this subsection. The department may review any recording made under 6this section.AB491,27Section 2. 51.61 (1) (o) of the statutes is amended to read:AB491,4,3851.61 (1) (o) Except as otherwise provided, have a right not to be filmed or 9taped, unless the patient signs an informed and voluntary consent that specifically 10authorizes a named individual or group to film or tape the patient for a particular 11purpose or project during a specified time period. The patient may specify in the 12consent periods during which, or situations in which, the patient may not be filmed 13or taped. If a patient is adjudicated incompetent, the consent shall be granted on 14behalf of the patient by the patient’s guardian. A patient in Goodland Hall at the 15Mendota Mental Health Institute, a patient detained or committed under ch. 980, 16or a patient who is in the legal custody of or under the supervision of the 17department of corrections, may be subject to video surveillance or filmed or taped 18without the patient’s consent, except that such a patient may not be filmed in 19patient bedrooms or bathrooms without the patient’s consent unless the patient is 20engaged in dangerous or disruptive behavior. A patient placed in a residential care 21center for children and youth, group home, or shelter care facility licensed under ch. 2248 may be subject to video surveillance or filmed or taped without the patient’s 23consent as authorized under s. 48.672. A treatment activity involving a patient 1committed or detained under ch. 980 may be filmed or taped if the purpose of the 2recording is to assess the quality of the treatment activity or to facilitate clinical 3supervision of the staff involved in the treatment activity.AB491,4,44